Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
CHAPTER 118 Conduct of Elections

118.010.
“Election”
defined — Application of chapter. [Repealed.]

118.015.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

A “political party” is an affiliation or organization of electors representing a political policy and having a constituted authority for its government and regulation, and whose candidate received at least twenty percent (20%) of the total vote cast at the last preceding election at which presidential electors were voted for;

The word “election” used in reference to a state, district, county, or city election, includes the decisions of questions submitted to the qualified voters as well as the choice of officers by them;

A “ballot” or “official ballot” means the official presentation of offices and candidates to be voted for, including write-in candidates, and all public questions submitted for determination, and shall include a voting machine ballot, a paper ballot, an absentee ballot, a federal provisional ballot, a federal provisional absentee ballot, or a supplemental paper ballot which has been authorized for the use of the voters in any primary, regular election, or special election by the Secretary of State or the county clerk;

“Ballot box” means any box, bag, or other container that can be locked, sealed, or otherwise rendered tamper-resistant, for receiving ballots;

“Election officer” means any person tasked with election administration within this state, as context dictates the defined role, including, but not limited to, the Secretary of State and his or her employees, members of the State Board of Elections and staff, members of the county boards of election and staff, precinct election officers, election officials, and poll workers;

“Voting equipment” means any physical component of a voting system and includes voting machines where voting machines are in operation;

“Voting machine” or “machine” means a part of a voting system that consists of:

A direct recording electronic voting machine that:

Records votes by means of a ballot display provided with mechanical or electro-operated components that may be actuated by the voter;

Processes the data by means of a computer program;

Records voting data and ballot images in internal and external memory components; and

Produces a tabulation of the voting data stored in a removable memory component and on a printed copy; or

One (1) or more electronic devices that operate independently or as a combination of a ballot marking device and an electronic or automatic vote tabulating device;

“Voting system” means:

The total combination of physical, mechanical, electromechanical, or electronic equipment, including the software, hardware, firmware, and documentation required to program, control, and support that equipment, that is used to:

Define ballots;

Cast and count votes;

Report or display election results; and

Maintain and produce any audit trail information; and

The practices and associated documentation used to:

Identify system components and versions of those components;

Test the system during its development and maintenance;

Maintain records of system errors and defects;

Determine specific system changes to be made to a system after the initial qualification of the system; and

Make available any materials to the voter, such as notices, instructions, forms, or paper ballots;

The word “resident” used in reference to a candidate in a state, district, county, or city election shall mean actual resident, without regard to the residence of the spouse of the candidate;

“Political organization” means a political group not constituting a political party within the meaning of subsection (1) of this section but whose candidate received two percent (2%) or more of the vote of the state at the last preceding election for presidential electors; and

“Political group” means a political group not constituting a political party or a political organization within the meaning of subsections (1) and (10) of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 97; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1; 1978, ch. 384, § 252, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 295, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 360, § 41, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 402, § 6, effective January 1, 1984; 1990, ch. 48, § 35, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 2, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 63, § 9, effective July 15, 2002; 2020 ch. 89, § 27, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 47, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 87, § 23, effective April 7, 2022.

118.020.
Voting
to be by secret ballot. [Repealed.]

118.025.
Voting to be by secret paper ballot — General laws applicable — Time for holding elections.

Except as otherwise provided by law, voting in all primaries and elections shall be by secret paper ballot.

The general laws applying to primaries, regular elections, and special elections shall apply to primaries, regular elections, and special elections conducted with the use of voting equipment, and all provisions of the general laws applying to the custody of ballot boxes shall apply, as far as applicable, to the custody of the voting system or voting equipment.

A primary for the nomination of candidates to be voted for at the next regular election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the third Monday in May of each year.

The election of all officers of all governmental units shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.

If the law authorizes the calling of a special election on a day other than the day of the regular election in November, the election shall be held on a Tuesday.

If the law requires that a special election be held within a period of time during which the voting equipment must be locked as required by KRS

117.295

, the special election shall be held on the fourth Tuesday following the expiration of the period during which the voting equipment is locked.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 98; 1982, ch. 402, § 3, effective January 1, 1984; 1984, ch. 44, § 6, effective March 2, 1984; 1986, ch. 29, § 12, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 431, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 288, § 38, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 296, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 394, § 20, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 195, § 13, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 261, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 262, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2008, ch. 129, § 6, effective July 15, 2008; 2020 ch. 88, § 5, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 48, effective June 29, 2021.

118.027.
Suspension or revision of election statutes.

Except as required by KRS

39A.100

related to the emergency powers granted to the Governor and Secretary of State as to the time and place for holding elections, no government official other than the General Assembly may suspend or revise any statute pertaining to elections.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 197, § 72, effective June 29, 2021.

118.030.
Time
of holding regular elections. [Repealed.]

118.035.
Hours
polls to be open — Employees to be allowed time off to vote, to apply
for or execute absentee ballot, and to serve or train to be election officer.

The polls shall be opened on the day of a primary, special election, or regular election at 6 a.m., prevailing time, and shall remain open until each voter who is waiting in line at the polls at 6 p.m., prevailing time, has voted. At 6 p.m., prevailing time, if voters are waiting at the polls to vote, the precinct election sheriff shall announce that a voter wishing to vote must immediately get in line. When all voters waiting at the polls at that time are in line, the precinct election sheriff shall then determine which voter is the last in line, and that voter shall be the last voter permitted to vote. The precinct election sheriff shall wait in line with the last voter who shall be permitted to vote until that voter has voted and shall inform a voter who subsequently arrives at the polls that no one shall be permitted to vote after the last voter in line at 6 p.m., prevailing time. After the last voter waiting in line at 6 p.m., prevailing time, has voted, the polls shall then be closed.

As provided in Section 148 of the Constitution of Kentucky, any person entitled to a vote at any election in this state shall, if he has made application for leave prior to the day he appears before the county clerk to request an application for or to execute an absentee ballot, be entitled to absent himself from any services or employment in which he is then engaged or employed for a reasonable time, but not less than four (4) hours on the day he appears before the clerk to request an application for or to execute an absentee ballot, during normal business hours of the office of the clerk or to cast his ballot on the day of the election between the time of opening and closing the polls. The employer may specify the hours during which an employee may absent himself.

No person shall be penalized for taking a reasonable time off to vote, unless, under circumstances which did not prohibit him from voting, he fails to vote. Any qualified voter who exercises his right to voting leave under this section but fails to cast his vote, under circumstances which did not prohibit him from voting, may be subject to disciplinary action.

Any person selected to serve as an election officer shall be entitled to absent himself from any services or employment in which he is then engaged or employed for a period of an entire day to attend training or to serve as an election officer. The person shall not, because of so absenting himself, be liable to any penalty. The employer may specify the hours during which the employee may absent himself. No person shall refuse an employee the privilege hereby conferred, or discharge or threaten to discharge an employee or subject an employee to a penalty, because of the exercise of the privilege.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 99; 1986, ch. 287, § 12, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 341, § 35, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 48, § 36, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 4, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2008, ch. 129, § 7, effective July 15, 2008.

118.040.
Hours
polls to be open. [Repealed.]

118.045.
Display
of American flag at voting location.

Every voting location on the day upon which any election is held shall, during voting hours, display an American flag of dimensions of reasonable size, which shall be firmly attached to the main entrance of the voting location so that it will be readily visible to the general public.

A precinct sheriff shall attach the American flag to the main entrance of the voting location upon the opening of the polls on the election day and shall remove the same upon the closing of the polls.

The fiscal court of every county shall purchase out of its general fund sufficient American flags for every voting location in that county. All American flags purchased by the fiscal court shall be manufactured in the United States.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 77, § 1; 1990, ch. 48, § 37, effective July 13, 1990; 2000, ch. 508, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 63, § 10, effective July 15, 2002; 2009, ch. 4, § 3, effective June 25, 2009.

118.050.
Voting
places. [Repealed.]

118.060.
Voting
rooms and booths. [Repealed.]

118.070.
Persons
entitled to have name placed on ballot for regular election. [Repealed.]

118.080.
Nomination
for regular election by petition. [Repealed.]

118.090.
Nomination
by minor political parties, and by major political parties for certain offices.
[Repealed.]

118.100.
Effect
of conflicting certificates and petitions of nomination. [Repealed.]